Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1161YC (2) 91 jm/md H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423B.7, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Subject to the requirement of paragraph âbâ , local 3 sales and services tax moneys received by a city or county 4 may be expended for any lawful purpose of the city or county, 5 including but not limited to expenses related to providing 6 emergency medical services within the applicable city or county 7 and payments to a nonprofit entity exempt from federal income 8 tax pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code 9 that provides public services in the applicable city or county . 10